normalesp/datasets/transducers/src/es-verbal-forms-fonemas.foma
# author: Jhon Adrián Cerón-Guzmán
# email: <jacerong@unal.edu.co>
# version: 0.1
# description: recuperar formas a partir de su transcripción fonética.

read spaced-text es-verbal-forms-fonemas.txt
define PhonemesToGraphemes;

define MinimalChanges [
                        x -> x ,, g -> g ,, "\u0263" -> "\u0263" ,,
                        x -> g , x -> g w , x -> "\u0263" || _ [e | i | j] ,,
                        g -> x , g -> g w || _ [e | i | j] ,,
                        "\u0263" -> x , "\u0263" -> g w || _ [e | i | j] ,,
                        "\u0263" u -> "\u0263" w , g u -> g w || [a | o]
                      ] .o.
                      [
                        j -> j ,, j -> i ,,
                        i -> i , i -> j || _ [a | e | o | u]
                      ] .o.
                      [
                        w -> w ,,
                        w -> u || _ [a | e | i | o]
                      ];

regex MinimalChanges .o. PhonemesToGraphemes;
